Hawaii, session 2026, SB2150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 378-2.8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  This section shall [not] apply to job listings for[:] full-time, part-time, temporary, or seasonal employees; provided that the employer employs at least one covered employee in the State, except for: (1)  Positions that are internal transfers or promotions within a current employer; or (2)  Public employee positions for which salary, benefits, or other compensation are determined pursuant to collective bargaining[; or (3)  Positions with employers having fewer than fifty employees]." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on January 1, 2027. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________